Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Part 5

Suppression of Black Flies

43-6-501. Legislative intent.

The general assembly recognizes the negative impact of uncontrolled populations of simulium jenningsi and simulium fibrinflatum (“black flies”) on the economy and quality of life of a region. The general assembly also recognizes that the tourism and agricultural industries can be particularly affected by an overpopulation of black flies and that an overpopulation may be likely to spread throughout the eastern part of the state as black fly populations increase with the improvement of water quality. The general assembly believes that it is important to explore potential solutions to black fly infestation before the black fly problem becomes unmanageable and industries important to the state suffer the consequences of state inaction.

Acts 2006, ch. 981, § 1.

Cross-References. Pest control board, § 62-21-104.

Pest control operators, title 62, ch. 21.

43-6-502. Study of biological suppression program.

The University of Tennessee shall initiate and administer a two-year black fly suppression program using a biological control agent in the Greenbrier Valley and the areas adjacent to the Pigeon River under the supervision of the department of agriculture. The university shall study the biological and socioeconomic effects of the suppression program on the region. The university shall report its findings to the department of agriculture and the department of environment and conservation. The university shall also report the results of the program to the energy, agriculture and natural resources committee of the senate and the agriculture and natural resources committee of the house of representatives.

The Tennessee wildlife resources agency is authorized to participate in the black fly suppression program in order to promote wildlife management by improving the quality of hunting and fishing conditions in the subject area.

None of the funds for the program authorized by this section shall be expended until all authorizations required by law have become final and effective, including, but not limited to, a permit required by the Water Quality Control Act of 1977, compiled in title 69, chapter 3, part 1.

Acts 2006, ch. 981, § 1; 2007, ch. 563, § 1; 2012, ch. 604, § 16; 2013, ch. 236, § 75.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006, ch. 981, § 1 provided that the provisions of the part shall have no application unless funding is specifically provided for and included in the general appropriations act. Funding was provided by Acts 2006, ch. 963, § 12, item 7.

Amendments. The 2007 amendment, in (a), substituted “two-year black fly suppression program” for “one-year black fly suppression program,” and deleted the former second sentence which read: “The program shall begin no later than May 2007.”

The 2012 amendment substituted “energy and environment committee” for “environment, conservation and tourism committee” in the last sentence of (a).

The 2013 amendment substituted “the energy, agriculture and natural resources committee of the senate and the agriculture and natural resources committee of the house of representatives” for “the commerce, labor, and agriculture committee of the senate, the energy and environment committee of the senate, the agriculture committee of the house of representatives, and the conservation and environment committee of the house of representatives” at the end of the last sentence in (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2007, ch. 563, § 2. June 27, 2007.

Acts 2012, ch. 604, § 24. July 1, 2012.

Acts 2013, ch. 236, § 94. April 19, 2013.

43-6-503. Biological control agent.

The biological control agent used in the program shall be known to pose no significant threat to people, animals, or the environment as used by the program. The department of agriculture is authorized to suspend the program indefinitely, if the agency has reason to believe that the safety of the citizens or the integrity of the environment of the subject area is threatened.

Acts 2006, ch. 981, § 1.

43-6-421. Cotton growers' organization — Certification.

43-6-431. General purpose — Construction.